Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3315
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-3301 to 77-3316 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Act on Interstate Arbitration and Compromise of Death Taxes.

Laws 1976, LB 584, § 15.